Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,109
Search warrants; contents; directed to peace officer.

If the judge before whom any such complaint is made is satisfied that there is reasonable cause for such belief, he or she shall issue a warrant directed to any peace officer having jurisdiction, commanding him or her to enter the house, building, premises, boat, vehicle, receptacle, or other place described and designated with particularity and to make diligent and careful search for alcoholic liquor manufactured, possessed, or kept for sale, contrary to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, and if any such alcoholic liquor is found, to seize the same, together with the vessels containing the same, and all property, implements, furniture, and vehicles kept or used for the purpose of violating, or with which to violate any of the provisions of the act, and to bring the same and any and all persons, if there are any, in whose possession they are found, before the judge who issued the warrant or some other judge having cognizance of the case.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 79, p. 415;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-379;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,109;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 16.